tools/nvda/louis/tables/ur-pk-g2.ctb
# Miscellaneous
word \x0631\x06C1 1235-2-125                                                RH                 R1H          adding vowel
word \x0627\x064E\x0628\x0650\x06CC\x0651\x0627\x06C1 1-12-6-13456-125      A1BE,IAH           AB,YH        word for Abijah
word \x0627\x06CC\x0644\x06CC\x0651\x0627\x06C1 1-24-123-15-13456-125       AILE,IAH           AILEYH       word for Elijah
word \x0628\x0636\x0644\x06CC\x0627\x06CC\x0644 12-1246-123-24-1-24-123     B$LIAIL            B$LIAIL      word for Bezalel - override contraction
word \x062F\x0627\x0648\x0654\x064F\x062F 145-4-2456-145                    DAW'UD             D@WD         word for David
word \x062F\x0627\x0648\x0654\x064F\x0614\x062F 145-4-2456-145              DAW'UD             D@WD         alternate spelling for David
word \x06A9\x06C1\x06C1 13-2-125                                            KHH                K1H          word for say
word \x0628\x0650\x0679\x0651\x06CC 12-2-246-24                             BE[,I              B1[I
word \x0645\x0648\x0631\x06C1 134-2456-1235-15-125                          MWRH               MWREH        adding vowel
word \x0635\x062F\x0642 12346-15-145-12345                                  &DQ                &EDQ
word \x06A9\x0646\x0648\x0626\x06CC\x06BA 13-136-1345-2456-24-56            KNW'I;             KUNWI;       spelling out as unusual word
noback word \x06A9\x0646\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC\x06BA 13-136-1345-2456-24-56      KNW'I;             KUNWI;
word \x06A9\x064F\x0646\x0648\x0626\x06CC\x06BA 13-136-1345-2456-24-56      KUNW'I;            KUNWI;       spelling out as unusual word
noback word \x06A9\x064F\x0646\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC\x06BA 13-136-1345-2456-24-56  KUNW'I;          KUNWI;
word \x0628\x06CC\x0631\x0633\x0628\x0639 12-15-24-1235-234-12-12356        BIRSB[             BEIRSB[      spelling out as unusual word
word \x0628\x06CC\x0631 12-15-24-1235                                       BIR                BEIR         spelling out as unusual word
word \x0628\x0626\x06CC\x0631 12-15-24-1235                                 B'IR               BEIR         spelling out as unusual word
noback word \x0628\x064A\x0654\x06CC\x0631 12-15-24-1235                    B'IR               BEIR         Added 2020-02-25
word \x0628\x06CC\x0648\x06CC 12-15-24-2456-24                              BEIWI              BEIWI        spelling out word for 'wife'
word \x067E\x0650\x06CC\x062C\x06CC\x06D2 1234-15-24-245-24-34              PEIJI34            PEIJI34      keep uncontracted
word \x0641\x0648\x0631\x0627\x064B 124-2456-1235-6                         FWRA;              FWR,
word \x0646\x0627\x0646\x0627 1345-1-1345-1                                 NANA               NANA         keep uncontracted 'grandfather'
word \x0645\x06C1\x0644\x062A 134-125-1-1236-2345                           MHLT               MHAVT        spelling out unusual word
word \x067E\x0644\x0627 1234-15-1236                                        PLA                PEV          adding vowel and contracting LA
word \x067E\x0644\x0627\x06CC\x0627 1234-15-1236-13456                      PLAIA              PEVY         adding vowel and contracting LA and IA
word \x0627\x0650\x0644\x06C1\x0650 1-15-1236-125-15                        AELHE              AEVHA        adding vowel and contracting LA
word \x0642\x0631\x06CC\x062A 12345-1235-13456-2345                         QRIT               QRYT         for pronunciation
word \x0645\x0650\x0637\x0631\x062F 134-2-23456-1235-145                    MITRD              M1TRD        for pronunciation
word \x0628\x06CC\x062C 12-15-24-245                                        BIJ                BEIJ         add vowel - 'seed'
word \x0628\x06CC\x0679\x06BE 12-2-24-246-236                               BI[8               B1I[8        add vowel
word \x0645\x064F\x0637\x0644\x0642 134-136-23456-123-2-12345               MU)LQ              MU)L1Q       add vowel
word \x0627\x0639\x0644\x06D2\x0670 1-12356-123-1236                        A(LYA              A(LV
begword \x0628\x0648\x0679\x0650 12-136-2456-246-15                         BW[E               BUW[E        add vowel
word \x0633\x062A\x0631\x06BE\x0648\x06CC\x06BA 234-2345-1235-2456-15-24-56 STR0WI;            STRWEI;      spelling
word \x062D\x064E\x0635\x06D2\x0650\x0635\x064E\x0648\x0646 156-2-12346-24-15-12346-2-2456-1345  :1&/E&1WN   :1&IE&1WN   spelling
word \x0628\x06CC\x062A\x064F\x0648\x0627\x06CC\x0644 12-24-2345-136-2456-1-24-123  -TUWAIL    BITUWAIL     spelling out name
noback word \x06AF\x0688\x0631\x0626\x06D2 1245-346-1235-24-34              G+R'/              G+RI/        'shepherds'
word \x0628\x06D2\s\x062E\x0645\x0650\x06CC\x0631\x06CC 36-1346-134-24-1235-24    B/ XMEIRI    -XMIRI       'unleavened'
word \x0627\x0628\x062F\x064F\x0627\x0644\x0622\x0628\x0627\x062F 1-12-145-136-123-345-12-1-145   ABDUAL>BAD   ABDUL>BAD   'forever'
noback word \x0627\x0628\x062F\x064F\x0627\x0644\x0627\x0653\x0628\x0627\x062F 1-12-145-136-123-345-12-1-145   ABDUAL>BAD   ABDUL>BAD   'forever' - as above but with ALEF plus MADDA ABOVE
word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x0628\x0631\x064F\x0648 1235-136-2456-0-12-1235-136-2456   RUWBRUW      RUW BRUW   'face to face'
noback word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x0628\x0631\x0648 1235-136-2456-0-12-1235-136-2456  RUWBRW       RUW BRUW   'face to face'
word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x062D\x064F\s\xFDF2 1235-136-2456-156-1-6-123-4-125               RUW:U A,L@H   RUW:A,L@H   'Spirit of God'
noback word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x062D\x064F\xFDF2 1235-136-2456-156-1-6-123-4-125          RUW:UA,L@H    RUW:A,L@H   'Spirit of God'
noback word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x062D\x064F\s\x0627\xFDF2 1235-136-2456-156-1-6-123-4-125  RUW:U AA,L@H  RUW:A,L@H   'Spirit of God'
word \x0628\x06CC\x0686 12-24-14                                            BIC                 BIC         override BI contraction 'sale'
word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x06CC\x0650 1235-136-56-34                          RUWIE               RU;/
word \x06C1\x062F\x0626\x06D2 125-145-24-34                                 HD'/                HDI/
word \x06AF\x0650\x0631\x062F\x0627\x06AF\x0650\x0631\x062F 1245-15-1235-145-1-0-1245-15-1235-145   GERDAGERD          GERDA GERD
noback word \x062E\x0631\x064F\x0648\x062C 1346-136-1235-136-2456-245       XRUWJ               XURUWJ       'Exodus'
word \x0628\x064F\x0648\x0679\x06D2\s\x062F\x0627\x0631 12-136-2456-246-34-5-145   BUW[/ "D     BUW[/"D      'embroidered'

# Names ending in AIL often have a space separating these letters from beginning - remove space
noback endword \s\x0627\x06CC\x0644\x0614 1-24-123  # with takhallus
endword \s\x0627\x06CC\x0644 1-24-123  # without takhallus
endword \s\x0627\x06CC\x0644\x0650\x06CC\x0648\x06BA 1-24-123-15-5-34  # AILE"/ as above but with Urdu for "ites" on the end 


# Ignoring vowel diacritics in braille
word \x0639\x064E\x0645\x0631\x0627\x0645 12356-134-1235-1-134              (1MRAM             (MRAM        ignore FATHA
word \x062A\x064E\x0648 2345-2456                                           T1W                TW           ignore FATHA
word \x062C\x064E\x06CC\x0633\x0627 245-24-234-1                            J1ISA              JISA         ignore FATHA
word \x062F\x064E\x0648\x0644\x062A\x0645\x0646\x062F 145-2456-123-2345-56-145  D1WLT;D        DWLT;D       ignore FATHA

word \x06C1\x0688\x0650\x0651\x06CC\x0648\x06BA 125-6-346-5-34              H+E,IW;            H,+"/        ignore KASRA
word \x062F\x0650\x06A9\x06BE\x0627\x0646\x06D2 145-13-236-35-34            DEK8AN/            DK89/        ignore KASRA
word \x0686\x0650\x06A9\x0646\x0627 14-13-26                                CEKNA              CK5          ignore KASRA
word \x0639\x0650\x0628\x0627\x062F\x062A 12356-12-1-145-2345               (EBADT             (BADT        ignore KASRA
word \x062A\x0627\x0631\x0650\x06CC\x06A9\x06CC 2345-1-1235-24-13-24        TAREIKI            TARIKI       ignore KASRA

word \x0632\x064F\x0628\x0627\x0646 1356-12-35                              ZUBAN              ZB9          ignore DAMMA
word \x06C1\x0627\x0631\x064F\x0648\x0646 125-1-1235-2456-1345              HARUWN             HARWN        ignore DAMMA
word \x0628\x06D2\x0634\x064F\x0645\x0627\x0631 36-146-134-1-1235           B/%UMAR            -%MAR        ignore DAMMA
word \x0628\x0627\x0632\x064F\x0648 12-1-1356-2456                          BAZUW              BAZW         ignore DAMMA
word \x0628\x064F\x0644\x0646\x062F 12-123-1345-145                         BULND              BLND         ignore DAMMA
word \x067E\x064F\x0648\x0631\x06CC 1234-2456-1235-24                       PUWRI              PWRI         ignore DAMMA
word \x0645\x064F\x062D\x0628\x0651\x062A 134-156-6-12-2345                 MU:,BT             M:,BT        ignore DAMMA
word \x0631\x064F\x0648\x062D\x064F\xFDF2 1235-136-2456-156-1-6-123-4-125   RUW:UA,L@H         RUW:A,L@H    ignore DAMMA

# Repeated words
word \x0679\x0650\x06BE\x06CC\x06A9\x0020\x0679\x0650\x06BE\x06CC\x06A9 135-3-3       [E8IK [E8IK        O''
word \x0622\x06AF\x06D2\x0020\x0622\x06AF\x06D2 345-1245-34-3-3                       >G/ >G/            >G/''
word \x0627\x0653\x06AF\x06D2\x0020\x0627\x0653\x06AF\x06D2 345-1245-34-3-3           A'G/ A'G/          >G/''
word \x0628\x0691\x06D2\x0020\x0628\x0691\x06D2 12-12456-34-3-3                       B]/ B]/            B]/''
word \x0627\x067E\x0646\x06CC\x0020\x0627\x067E\x0646\x06CC 1-1234-1345-24-3-3        APNI APNI          APNI''
word \x06A9\x0631\x062A\x0627\x0020\x06A9\x0631\x062A\x0627 13-1235-2345-1-3-3        KRTA KRTA          KRTA''
word \x062C\x0644\x062F\x06CC\s\x062C\x0644\x062F\x06CC 245-123-145-24-3-3            JLDI JLDI          JLDI''
word \x0627\x0686\x06BE\x0651\x06D2\s\x0627\x0686\x06BE\x0651\x06D2 1-6-16-34-3-3     AC8,/ AC8,/        A,*/''
word \x062A\x06BE\x0648\x0691\x0627\s\x062A\x06BE\x0648\x0691\x0627 5-1256-1-3-3      T8W]A T8W]A        "[backslash]W]A''
word \x0633\x0627\x062A\x06BE\s\x0633\x0627\x062A\x06BE 3456-234-3-3                  SAT8 SAT8          #S''
word \x0628\x0627\x063A\s\x0628\x0627\x063A 12-1-126-3-3                   BA< BA<            BA<''
word \x062F\x06CC\x06A9\x06BE\x062A\x06D2\s\x062F\x06CC\x06A9\x06BE\x062A\x06D2 145-24-13-236-2345-34-3-3  DIK8T/ DIK8T/     DIK8T/''
word \x0686\x0650\x0644\x0651\x0627\s\x0686\x0650\x0644\x0651\x0627 14-15-6-1236-3-3  CEL,A CEL,A          CE,V''
word \x0639\x064F\x0636\x0648\x0639\x064F\x0636\x0648 12356-136-1246-2456-3-3         (U$W(U$W             (U$W''
word \x0688\x0628\x0648\x0688\x0628\x0648 346-12-2456-3-3                             +BW+BW               +BW''

# Corrections
# Takhallus
noback correct "\s\x0614\s" "\s" # replace Arabic Takhallus surrounded by space with 1 space 
noback correct "\x0614" ? # remove other Arabic Takhallus completely

# -- End of table --
